Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2182.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2219, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2219. Emergency medical care technicians; requirements; transportation A. An Each emergency medical care technician shall comply with either emergency medical standards and protocols established by the regional council or the medical direction for the local jurisdiction when considering emergency transport, including the appropriate use of telecommunications. B. An emergency medical care technician may not do either of the following: 1. Provide a patient with a presumptive medical diagnosis and use that medical diagnosis as the basis for counseling the patient to decline emergency medical services transportation, unless requested by the patient or the patient's representative. 2. Counsel a patient to decline emergency medical services transportation, except as part of a specific alternate destination or treat-and-refer program that includes quality management and comprehensive medical direction oversight. C. An Each emergency medical care technician shall explain to a patient the risks and consequences to the patient's health of not being transported. D. It is not a violation of this section for an emergency medical care technician to inform a patient of the patient's right to accept or decline emergency medical services transportation, unless the emergency medical care technician does so in an effort to coerce the patient to decline emergency medical services. END_STATUTE